Alaska, session 34, SB241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 45.50.471(b) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 05 (58) advertising, displaying, or offering a price for goods or services to 06 a consumer that does not include all mandatory fees or charges, other than taxes 07 imposed by a government entity. 08 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.